test/src/morphology/N-ishtiim_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - ištīm: # Noun 154 'eng /est iste/fin' - full paradigm
     ištīm+N+Sg+Nom: ištīm
     ištīm+N+Sg+Gen: ištīm
     ištīm+N+Sg+Par: ištīmt
     ištīm+N+Sg+Dat: ištīmõn
     ištīm+N+Sg+Ins: ištīmõks
     ištīm+N+Sg+Ill: ištīmõ
     ištīm+N+Sg+Ela: ištīmõst
     ištīm+N+Pl+Nom: ištmõd
     ištīm+N+Pl+Gen: ištmõd
     ištīm+N+Pl+Par: ištmidi
     ištīm+N+Pl+Dat: ištmõdõn
     ištīm+N+Pl+Ins: ištmõdõks
     ištīm+N+Pl+Ill: ištmiž
     ištīm+N+Pl+Ela: ištmist
